Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,169
Debtor; application for hearing; when effective; hearing.

A written application, pursuant to sections 77-27,165 and 77-27,168, by a debtor for a hearing shall be effective upon mailing the application, postage prepaid and properly addressed, to the Department of Health and Human Services.

If the Department of Health and Human Services receives a written application contesting a claim, it shall grant a hearing to the taxpayer or state lottery prize winner to determine whether the claim is valid. If the amount asserted as due and owing is not correct, an adjustment to the claimed amount shall be made. No issues shall be reconsidered at the hearing which have been previously litigated.

Laws 1984, LB 845, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 76;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 806;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 207.